Indiana, session 2026, SB173.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 5-10-8-14.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 14.5. (a) As used in this section, "anesthesia time"
means the period beginning when an anesthesia practitioner begins
to prepare a patient for anesthesia services in the operating room
or an equivalent area and ends when the anesthesia practitioner is
no longer furnishing anesthesia services to the patient. The term
includes blocks of time around an interruption in anesthesia time
provided that the anesthesia practitioner is furnishing continuous
anesthesia care within the time periods surrounding the
interruption.
(b) As used in this section, "covered individual" means an
individual who is entitled to coverage under a state employee
health plan.
(c) As used in this section, "state employee health plan" means
SB 173—LS 6570/DI 104


a:
(1) self-insurance program established under section 7(b) of
this chapter; or
(2) contract with a prepaid health care delivery plan that is
entered into or renewed under section 7(c) of this chapter;
that is issued, amended, or renewed after June 30, 2026, to provide
individual or group health coverage that includes coverage for
anesthesia services.
(d) The state employee health plan may not impose any of the
following concerning the provision of anesthesia services to a
covered individual during a medical procedure:
(1) A time limit on the amount of covered anesthesia time for
any medical procedure.
(2) Restrictions or exclusions of coverage or payment of
anesthesia time.
SECTION 2. IC 6-1.1-10-16, AS AMENDED BY P.L.230-2025,
SECTION 26, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 16. (a) All or part of a building is exempt from
property taxation if it is owned, occupied, and used by a person for
educational, literary, scientific, religious, or charitable purposes.
(b) A building is exempt from property taxation if it is owned,
occupied, and used by a town, city, township, or county for educational,
literary, scientific, fraternal, or charitable purposes.
(c) A tract of land, including the campus and athletic grounds of an
educational institution, is exempt from property taxation if:
(1) a building that is exempt under subsection (a) or (b) is situated
on it;
(2) a parking lot or structure that serves a building referred to in
subdivision (1) is situated on it; or
(3) the tract:
(A) is owned by a nonprofit entity established for the purpose
of retaining and preserving land and water for their natural
characteristics;
(B) does not exceed five hundred (500) acres; and
(C) is not used by the nonprofit entity to make a profit.
(d) A tract of land is exempt from property taxation if:
(1) it is purchased for the purpose of erecting a building that is to
be owned, occupied, and used in such a manner that the building
will be exempt under subsection (a) or (b); and
(2) not more than four (4) years after the property is purchased,
and for each year after the four (4) year period, the owner
demonstrates substantial progress and active pursuit towards the
SB 173—LS 6570/DI 104


erection of the intended building and use of the tract for the
exempt purpose. To establish substantial progress and active
pursuit under this subdivision, the owner must prove the existence
of factors such as the following:
(A) Organization of and activity by a building committee or
other oversight group.
(B) Completion and filing of building plans with the
appropriate local government authority.
(C) Cash reserves dedicated to the project of a sufficient
amount to lead a reasonable individual to believe the actual
construction can and will begin within four (4) years.
(D) The breaking of ground and the beginning of actual
construction.
(E) Any other factor that would lead a reasonable individual to
believe that construction of the building is an active plan and
that the building is capable of being completed within eight (8)
years considering the circumstances of the owner.
If the owner of the property sells, leases, or otherwise transfers a tract
of land that is exempt under this subsection, the owner is liable for the
property taxes that were not imposed upon the tract of land during the
period beginning January 1 of the fourth year following the purchase
of the property and ending on December 31 of the year of the sale,
lease, or transfer. The county auditor of the county in which the tract
of land is located may establish an installment plan for the repayment
of taxes due under this subsection. The plan established by the county
auditor may allow the repayment of the taxes over a period of years
equal to the number of years for which property taxes must be repaid
under this subsection.
(e) Personal property is exempt from property taxation if it is owned
and used in such a manner that it would be exempt under subsection (a)
or (b) if it were a building.
(f) A hospital's property that is exempt from property taxation under
subsection (a), (b), or (e) shall remain exempt from property taxation
even if the property is used in part to furnish goods or services to
another hospital whose property qualifies for exemption under this
section.
(g) Property owned by a shared hospital services organization that
is exempt from federal income taxation under Section 501(c)(3) or
501(e) of the Internal Revenue Code is exempt from property taxation
if it is owned, occupied, and used exclusively to furnish goods or
services to a hospital whose property is exempt from property taxation
under subsection (a), (b), or (e).
SB 173—LS 6570/DI 104


(h) This section does not exempt from property tax an office or a
practice of a physician or group of physicians that is owned by a
hospital licensed under IC 16-21-2 or other property that is not
substantially related to or supportive of the inpatient facility of the
hospital unless the office, practice, or other property:
(1) provides or supports the provision of charity care (as defined
in IC 16-18-2-52.5), IC 16-18-2-52.5(b)), including providing
funds or other financial support for health care services for
individuals who are indigent (as defined in IC 16-18-2-52.5(b)
IC 16-18-2-52.5(c) and IC 16-18-2-52.5(c));
IC 16-18-2-52.5(d)); or
(2) provides or supports the provision of community benefits (as
defined in IC 16-21-9-1), including research, education, or
government sponsored indigent health care (as defined in
IC 16-21-9-2).
However, participation in the Medicaid or Medicare program alone
does not entitle an office, practice, or other property described in this
subsection to an exemption under this section.
(i) A tract of land or a tract of land plus all or part of a structure on
the land is exempt from property taxation if:
(1) the tract is acquired for the purpose of erecting, renovating, or
improving a single family residential structure that is to be given
away or sold:
(A) in a charitable manner;
(B) by a nonprofit organization; and
(C) to low income individuals who will:
(i) use the land as a family residence; and
(ii) not have an exemption for the land under this section;
(2) the tract does not exceed three (3) acres; and
(3) the tract of land or the tract of land plus all or part of a
structure on the land is not used for profit while exempt under this
section.
(j) An exemption under subsection (i) terminates when the property
is conveyed by the nonprofit organization to another owner.
(k) When property that is exempt in any year under subsection (i) is
conveyed to another owner, the nonprofit organization receiving the
exemption must file a certified statement with the auditor of the county,
notifying the auditor of the change not later than sixty (60) days after
the date of the conveyance. The county auditor shall immediately
forward a copy of the certified statement to the county assessor. A
nonprofit organization that fails to file the statement required by this
subsection is liable for the amount of property taxes due on the
SB 173—LS 6570/DI 104


property conveyed if it were not for the exemption allowed under this
chapter.
(l) If property is granted an exemption in any year under subsection
(i) and the owner:
(1) fails to transfer the tangible property within eight (8) years
after the assessment date for which the exemption is initially
granted; or
(2) transfers the tangible property to a person who:
(A) is not a low income individual; or
(B) does not use the transferred property as a residence for at
least one (1) year after the property is transferred;
the person receiving the exemption shall notify the county recorder and
the county auditor of the county in which the property is located not
later than sixty (60) days after the event described in subdivision (1) or
(2) occurs. The county auditor shall immediately inform the county
assessor of a notification received under this subsection.
(m) If subsection (l)(1) or (l)(2) applies, the owner shall pay, not
later than the date that the next installment of property taxes is due, an
amount equal to the sum of the following:
(1) The total property taxes that, if it were not for the exemption
under subsection (i), would have been levied on the property in
each year in which an exemption was allowed.
(2) Interest on the property taxes at the rate of ten percent (10%)
per year.
(n) The liability imposed by subsection (m) is a lien upon the
property receiving the exemption under subsection (i). An amount
collected under subsection (m) shall be collected as an excess levy. If
the amount is not paid, it shall be collected in the same manner that
delinquent taxes on real property are collected.
(o) Property referred to in this section shall be assessed to the extent
required under IC 6-1.1-11-9.
(p) This subsection applies to assessment dates occurring before
January 1, 2026. A for-profit provider of early childhood education
services to children who are at least four (4) but less than six (6) years
of age on the annual assessment date may receive the exemption
provided by this section for property used for educational purposes
only if all the requirements of section 46 of this chapter are satisfied.
A for-profit provider of early childhood education services that
provides the services only to children younger than four (4) years of
age may not receive the exemption provided by this section for
property used for educational purposes.
(q) This subsection applies to assessment dates occurring after
SB 173—LS 6570/DI 104


December 31, 2025. Property used by a for-profit provider of early
childhood education services to children who are less than six (6) years
of age on the annual assessment date may receive the exemption
provided by this section for property used for educational purposes
only if all the requirements of section 46 of this chapter are satisfied.
(r) This subsection applies only to property taxes that are first due
and payable in calendar years 2025 and 2026. All or part of a building
is deemed to serve a charitable purpose and is exempt from property
taxation if it is owned by a nonprofit entity that is:
(1) registered as a continuing care retirement community under
IC 23-2-4 and charges an entry fee of not more than five hundred
thousand dollars ($500,000) per unit;
(2) defined as a small house health facility under
IC 16-18-2-331.9;
(3) licensed as a health care or residential care facility under
IC 16-28; or
(4) licensed under IC 31-27 and designated as a qualified
residential treatment provider that provides services under a
contract with the department of child services.
This subsection expires January 1, 2027.
SECTION 3. IC 6-1.1-10-18.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.230-2025,
SECTION 27, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 18.5. (a) This section does not exempt from
property tax an office or a practice of a physician or group of
physicians that is owned by a hospital licensed under IC 16-21-2 or
other property that is not substantially related to or supportive of the
inpatient facility of the hospital unless the office, practice, or other
property:
(1) provides or supports the provision of charity care (as defined
in IC 16-18-2-52.5), IC 16-18-2-52.5(b)), including funds or
other financial support for health care services for individuals
who are indigent (as defined in IC 16-18-2-52.5(b)
IC 16-18-2-52.5(c) and IC 16-18-2-52.5(c));
IC 16-18-2-52.5(d)); or
(2) provides or supports the provision of community benefits (as
defined in IC 16-21-9-1), including research, education, or
government sponsored indigent health care (as defined in
IC 16-21-9-2).
However, participation in the Medicaid or Medicare program, alone,
does not entitle an office, a practice, or other property described in this
subsection to an exemption under this section.
(b) Tangible property is exempt from property taxation if it is:
SB 173—LS 6570/DI 104


(1) owned by an Indiana nonprofit corporation; and
(2) used by an Indiana nonprofit corporation in the operation of
a hospital licensed under IC 16-21, a health facility licensed under
IC 16-28, a residential care facility for the aged and licensed
under IC 16-28, or a Christian Science home or sanatorium.
(c) This subsection applies only to property taxes first due and
payable in calendar years 2025 and 2026. Tangible property that is not
otherwise exempt from property taxation under subsection (b) is
exempt from property taxation if it is:
(1) owned by an Indiana nonprofit corporation; and
(2) used by an Indiana nonprofit corporation in the operation of
a continuing care retirement community under IC 23-2-4 that
charges an entry fee of not more than five hundred thousand
dollars ($500,000) per unit as described in section 16(r)(1) of this
chapter, a small house health facility under IC 16-18-2-331.9, or
a qualified residential treatment provider listed in section 16(r)(4)
of this chapter.
This subsection expires January 1, 2027.
(d) Property referred to in this section shall be assessed to the extent
required under IC 6-1.1-11-9.
SECTION 4. IC 12-15-5-22 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 22. (a) As used in this section, "anesthesia time"
means the period beginning when an anesthesia practitioner begins
to prepare a patient for anesthesia services in the operating room
or an equivalent area and ends when the anesthesia practitioner is
no longer furnishing anesthesia services to the patient. The term
includes blocks of time around an interruption in anesthesia time
provided that the anesthesia practitioner is furnishing continuous
anesthesia care within the time periods surrounding the
interruption.
(b) Unless otherwise prohibited by federal law, the state
Medicaid plan may not impose any of the following concerning the
provision of anesthesia services during a medical procedure:
(1) A time limit on the amount of covered anesthesia time for
any medical procedure.
(2) Restrictions or exclusions of coverage or payment of
anesthesia time.
SECTION 5. IC 16-18-2-52.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.188-2025,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 52.5. (a) "Charity care", for purposes of
IC 16-21-6 and IC 16-21-9, means medically necessary health care
SB 173—LS 6570/DI 104


services provided free of charge or at a discounted rate under the
hospital's written financial assistance policy to patients who meet
income and asset criteria.
(a) (b) "Charity care", for purposes of IC 16-21-6, IC 16-21-9, and
IC 16-40-6, means the unreimbursed cost to a hospital of providing,
funding, or otherwise financially supporting health care services:
(1) to a person classified by the hospital as financially indigent or
medically indigent on an inpatient or outpatient basis; and
(2) to financially indigent patients through other nonprofit or
public outpatient clinics, hospitals, or health care organizations.
(b) (c) As used in this section, subsection (b), "financially indigent"
means an uninsured or underinsured person who is accepted for care
with no obligation or a discounted obligation to pay for the services
rendered based on the hospital's financial criteria and procedure used
to determine if a patient is eligible for charity care. The criteria and
procedure must include income levels and means testing indexed to the
federal poverty guidelines. A hospital may determine that a person is
financially or medically indigent under the hospital's eligibility system
after health care services are provided.
(c) (d) As used in this section, subsection (b), "medically indigent"
means a person whose medical or hospital bills after payment by third
party payors exceed a specified percentage of the patient's annual gross
income as determined in accordance with the hospital's eligibility
system, and who is financially unable to pay the remaining bill.
SECTION 6. IC 16-18-2-65.2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 65.2. "Community health needs
assessment", for purposes of IC 16-21-9, has the meaning set forth
in IC 16-21-9-1.5.
SECTION 7. IC 16-18-2-247.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 247.5. "Neuroplastogen", for
purposes of IC 16-42-26.7, has the meaning set forth in
IC 16-42-26.7-1.
SECTION 8. IC 16-18-2-288, AS AMENDED BY P.L.96-2014,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 288. (a) "Practitioner", for purposes of
IC 16-42-19, has the meaning set forth in IC 16-42-19-5.
(b) "Practitioner", for purposes of IC 16-41-14, has the meaning set
forth in IC 16-41-14-4.
(c) "Practitioner", for purposes of IC 16-42-21, has the meaning set
forth in IC 16-42-21-3.
SB 173—LS 6570/DI 104


(d) "Practitioner", for purposes of IC 16-42-22 and IC 16-42-25, has
the meaning set forth in IC 16-42-22-4.5.
(e) "Practitioner", for purposes of IC 16-42-26.7, has the
meaning set forth in IC 16-42-26.7-2.
SECTION 9. IC 16-18-2-317.4 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 317.4. "Research institution", for
purposes of IC 16-42-26.7, has the meaning set forth in
IC 16-42-26.7-3.
SECTION 10. IC 16-21-9-1 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) As used in this
chapter, "community benefits" means the unreimbursed cost to a
hospital of providing the following:
(1) Charity care.
(2) Government sponsored indigent health care. donations,
education, government sponsored program services, research, and
subsidized health services.
(3) Subsidized clinical services provided despite a net financial
loss if not providing the services would result in the
community loss of access to the services.
(4) Services and activities that address needs identified in the
nonprofit hospital's community health needs assessment.
(b) The term does not include any of the following:
(1) The cost to the hospital of paying any taxes or other
governmental assessments.
(2) Bad debt.
(3) Contractual allowances and discounts negotiated with
third party payors.
(4) Payment disruptions unrelated to hospital policy.
(5) Staff education required for licensure or certification.
(6) Activities with a primary purpose of marketing, lobbying,
fundraising, or routine operations.
SECTION 11. IC 16-21-9-1.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1.5. As used in this chapter,
"community health needs assessment" refers to a nonprofit
hospital's most recent assessment that meets the requirements set
forth in 26 U.S.C. 501(r)(3).
SECTION 12. IC 16-21-9-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.6-2012,
SECTION 115, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) Each nonprofit hospital shall
prepare an annual report of the community benefits plan. The report
SB 173—LS 6570/DI 104


must include, in addition to the community benefits plan itself, the
following background information:
(1) The hospital's mission statement.
(2) A disclosure of the health care needs of the community that
were considered in developing the hospital's community benefits
plan.
(3) A disclosure of the amount and types of community benefits
actually provided, including charity care. Charity care must be
reported as a separate item from other community benefits.
(4) The following information concerning the hospital's
charity care program:
(A) The eligibility criteria.
(B) The number of program applications received by the
hospital in the previous calendar year.
(C) The number of approvals and denials of the
applications received, as described in clause (B).
(5) Each government sponsored indigent health care program
that the hospital participated in during the previous calendar
year and the net cost of the program to the hospital. Net costs
must account for any supplemental payments made to the
hospital under the program, including those provided under
IC 12-15-16.
(6) A list of each clinical service provided at a subsidized cost
by the hospital and the net cost to the hospital for the
subsidized clinical service.
(7) A list of each service provided, and any activity invested
in, to address any need identified in the community health
needs assessment, and the following information for each
service or activity listed:
(A) The net cost of each item.
(B) The need in the community health needs assessment
that each item addresses.
(C) The estimated impact of the item on addressing the
identified need.
(8) An estimate of the value of the:
(A) sales tax exemption under IC 6-2.5-5; and
(B) property tax exemption under IC 6-1.1-10;
for the hospital.
(9) Any net revenue derived from the hospital's participation
in the federal 340B Drug Pricing Program under 42 U.S.C.
256b(a)(4).
(b) Not later than one hundred twenty (120) days after the close
SB 173—LS 6570/DI 104


of a nonprofit hospital's fiscal year, each nonprofit hospital shall
annually file a the report of the community benefits plan described in
subsection (a) with the state department. For a hospital's fiscal year
that ends before July 1, 2011, the report must be filed not later than one
hundred twenty (120) days after the close of the hospital's fiscal year.
For a hospital's fiscal year that ends after June 30, 2011, the report
must be filed at the same time the nonprofit hospital files its annual
return described under Section 6033 of the Internal Revenue Code that
is timely filed under Section 6072(e) of the Internal Revenue Code,
including any applicable extension authorized under Section 6081 of
the Internal Revenue Code. The nonprofit hospital shall post the
report on the nonprofit hospital's website.
(c) Each nonprofit hospital shall prepare a statement that notifies the
public that the annual report of the community benefits plan is:
(1) public information;
(2) filed with the state department; and
(3) available to the public on the nonprofit hospital's website
and by request from the state department.
This statement shall be posted in prominent places throughout the
hospital, including the emergency room waiting area and the
admissions office waiting area. The statement shall also be printed in
the hospital patient guide or other material that provides the patient
with information about the admissions criteria of the hospital.
(d) Each nonprofit hospital shall develop a written notice about any
charity care program operated by the hospital and how to apply for
charity care. The notice must be in appropriate languages if possible.
The notice must also be conspicuously posted in the following areas:
(1) The general waiting area.
(2) The waiting area for emergency services.
(3) The business office.
(4) Any other area that the hospital considers an appropriate area
in which to provide notice of a charity care program.
(e) The state department shall post a report submitted under
this section on the state department's website.
SECTION 13. IC 16-21-9-8 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) The state
department may assess a civil penalty against a nonprofit hospital that
fails to make a report of the community benefits plan as required under
this chapter. The penalty may not exceed one ten thousand dollars
($1,000) ($10,000) for each day a report is delinquent after the date on
which the report is due. No penalty may be assessed against a hospital
under this section until thirty (30) business days have elapsed after
SB 173—LS 6570/DI 104


written notification to the hospital of its failure to file a report.
(b) The penalty collected under this section shall be deposited in
the local public health fund established by IC 16-46-10-1.
SECTION 14. IC 16-42-26.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 26.7. Right to Try Investigational Neuroplastogens
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "neuroplastogen" means a drug
or compound that:
(1) demonstrates rapid onset neuroplastic effects in humans;
and
(2) has successfully completed Phase I of a federal Food and
Drug Administration approved clinical trial.
The term includes psilocybin (as defined in IC 12-21-9-2).
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "practitioner" means a health
professional who:
(1) is licensed and in good standing under IC 25;
(2) has prescriptive authority; and
(3) is acting within the health professional's scope of practice.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "research institution" means an
organization that meets all of the following:
(1) Has an academic institution that operates an institutional
review board (IRB) that oversees research.
(2) Publishes the results of previous clinical trials in peer
reviewed publications.
(3) Has access to a clinical research center and the center's
resources, including research dedicated medical staff.
Sec. 4. An individual must meet the following requirements in
order to qualify as an eligible patient under this chapter:
(1) Has been diagnosed with a life threatening condition as
defined in 21 CFR 312.81 and meets the criteria set forth in 21
U.S.C. 360bbb-0a.
(2) Provides written informed consent to the practitioner for
the treatment.
Sec. 5. (a) Notwithstanding IC 35-48, a practitioner may
administer or supervise the psychotherapy supported
administration of a neuroplastogen to a patient if the following
conditions are met:
(1) The practitioner has evaluated the patient, reviewed the
patient's medical history, and documented in the patient's
medical charts the clinical rationale for the practitioner
determining that the patient is qualified and could benefit
SB 173—LS 6570/DI 104


from the treatment.
(2) The practitioner has obtained and documented the
patient's written informed consent as set forth in subsection
(b) for the treatment.
(3) The patient meets the requirements set forth in section 4
of this chapter.
(4) The practitioner takes reasonable steps to ensure patient
safety, including structured psychological monitoring and
integration services, during the patient's neuroplastogen
treatment and recovery.
(5) The neuroplastogen is obtained from a manufacturer or
distributor that is registered with the federal Drug
Enforcement Agency.
(6) The practitioner notifies the state department in the
manner prescribed by the state department not later than
thirty (30) days from the initial administration of the
neuroplastogen to a patient.
(7) The practitioner submits the report required by section 7
of this chapter.
(b) Written informed consent under subsection (a)(2) must
include the following:
(1) An explanation of the currently approved products and
treatments for the individual's condition.
(2) An attestation by the individual of the individual's life
threatening condition and that the individual concurs with the
individual's physician that all currently approved treatments
are unlikely to prolong the individual's life or improve the
individual's life threatening condition.
(3) A clear identification of the investigational neuroplastogen
treatment proposed to be used to treat the individual.
(4) A description of the best and worst outcomes, including
the most likely outcome, resulting from use of the
investigational treatment of the individual's life threatening
condition. The description of outcomes must be based on the
treating physician's knowledge of both the investigational
neuroplastogen treatment and the individual's life threatening
condition.
(5) A statement acknowledging that new, unanticipated,
different, or worse symptoms or death may result from the
proposed treatment.
(6) A statement that the individual's health insurance may not
be obligated to pay for any care or treatment and that the
SB 173—LS 6570/DI 104


patient may be liable for all expenses of the treatment unless
specifically required to do so by contract or law.
(7) A statement that eligibility for hospice care may be
withdrawn if the individual begins investigational
neuroplastogen treatment and does not meet hospice care
eligibility requirements.
(8) A statement that the individual or the individual's legal
guardian consents to the investigational neuroplastogen
treatment for the life threatening condition.
(c) The state department shall establish a notification procedure
described in subsection (a)(6) to be used under this chapter.
Sec. 6. (a) A practitioner, research institution, or clinic may
conduct neuroplastogen outcomes access research if the following
conditions are met:
(1) Any data collected and maintained in a patient registry
that complies with the federal Health Insurance Portability
and Accountability Act (HIPAA) and only includes
de-identified patient data.
(2) The practitioner or clinic follows any best practice
guidelines and protocols that have been issued by the United
States Department of Health and Human Services, including:
(A) safety monitoring;
(B) psychotherapy support; and
(C) outcome measures.
(b) The state department may do the following:
(1) Implement Institutional Review Board (IRB) oversight
protocols, including protocols for streamlined reporting of
data under this chapter.
(2) Collaborate with research institutions in the development
of standards and protocols to be used for research conducted
under this chapter.
(3) Establish a registry to maintain data collected under this
chapter.
(4) Adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to implement this chapter,
including rules concerning the following:
(A) Safety standards.
(B) Standardized informed consent forms.
(C) Data elements for inclusion in a registry.
(D) Adverse event reporting.
(E) Staff qualifications for psychotherapy support.
(F) Standardized notification forms for section 4 of this
chapter.
SB 173—LS 6570/DI 104


(G) Report formatting.
Sec. 7. (a) Before February 1 of each year, a practitioner who
performs neuroplastogen treatment under this chapter shall report
the following information concerning the previous calendar year
to the state department:
(1) The number of patients for whom the practitioner has
conducted neuroplastogen treatment.
(2) Each neuroplastogen used and the typical dosage range.
(3) Any adverse event (as defined in 21 CFR 312.32(a)).
The report may not include patient identifying information.
(b) Before May 1 of each year, the state department shall
aggregate and publish on the state department's website
de-identified statistics from the reports submitted under subsection
(a).
Sec. 8. Nothing in this chapter may be construed to do any of the
following:
(1) Allow nonmedical use of neuroplastogens.
(2) Supersede federal law or regulation.
(3) Reschedule a controlled substance.
(4) Create a fiscal burden on the state.
(5) Require a practitioner, clinic, research institution, or other
person to participate in providing treatment under this
chapter.
(6) Mandate insurance coverage for treatment under this
chapter.
Sec. 9. A practitioner, eligible facility (as defined in
IC 16-42-26.5-1), research institution, or other person participating
in providing treatment that complies with the requirements of this
chapter is immune from criminal or civil liability.
SECTION 15. IC 16-46-10-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.164-2023,
SECTION 39, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) The local public health fund is established
for the purpose of providing local boards of health with funds as
provided in sections 2.1 through 2.3 of this chapter to provide public
health services. The fund shall be administered by the state department
and consists of:
(1) appropriations by the general assembly;
(2) penalties paid and deposited in the fund under IC 6-8-11-17
and IC 16-21-9-8; and
(3) amounts, if any, that another statute requires to be distributed
to the fund from the Indiana tobacco master settlement agreement
fund.
SB 173—LS 6570/DI 104


(b) The expenses of administering the fund shall be paid from
money in the fund.
(c) The treasurer of state shall invest the money in the fund not
currently needed to meet the obligations of the fund in the same
manner as other public funds may be invested. Interest that accrues
from these investments shall be deposited in the fund.
SECTION 16. IC 27-1-24.2-16, AS ADDED BY P.L.189-2025,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 16. (a) Except as provided in section 15 of this
chapter, with respect to the provision of pharmacy or pharmacist
services under a health plan, an insurer, a pharmacy benefit manager,
or any other administrator of pharmacy benefits may not:
(1) prohibit a pharmacy or pharmacist from, or impose a penalty
on a pharmacy or pharmacist for:
(A) selling a lower cost alternative to an insured, if a lower
cost alternative is available; or
(B) providing information to an insured under subsection (c);
(2) discriminate against any pharmacy or pharmacist that is:
(A) located within the geographic coverage area of the health
plan; and
(B) willing to agree to, or accept, terms and conditions
established for participation in the insurer's, pharmacy benefit
manager's, other administrator's, or health plan's network;
(3) impose limits, including quantity limits or refill frequency
limits, on an insured's access to medication from a pharmacy that
are more restrictive than those existing for a pharmacy affiliate;
(4) except as provided in subsection (b), require an insured to
receive pharmacy or pharmacist services from a pharmacy
affiliate, including:
(A) requiring an insured to obtain a specialty drug from a
pharmacy affiliate; and
(B) charging less cost sharing to insureds that use pharmacy
affiliates than what is charged to insureds that use
nonaffiliated pharmacies;
(5) require a pharmacy or pharmacist to enter into an additional
contract with an affiliate of the insurer, pharmacy benefit
manager, or other administrator of pharmacy benefits as a
condition of entering into a contract with this insurer, pharmacy
benefit manager, or administrator; or
(6) require a pharmacy or pharmacist to, as a condition of a
contract, agree to payment rates for any affiliate of the insurer,
pharmacy benefit manager, or other administrator of pharmacy
SB 173—LS 6570/DI 104


benefits that is not a party to the contract; or
(7) designate a prescription drug as a specialty drug unless the
drug is a limited distribution that:
(A) requires special handling; and
(B) is not commonly carried at retail pharmacies or
oncology clinics or practices.
(b) Subsection (a)(4):
(1) does not apply to a mail order pharmacy; and
(2) may not be construed to prohibit:
(A) communications to insureds regarding networks and prices
if the communication is accurate and includes information
about all eligible nonaffiliated pharmacies; or
(B) an insurer, a pharmacy benefit manager, or any other
administrator of pharmacy benefits from providing financial
incentives for utilizing the network, if the insurer, pharmacy
benefit manager, or other administrator complies with this
section and section 14 of this chapter.
(c) A pharmacist shall have the right to provide an insured with
information regarding lower cost alternatives to assist the insured in
making informed decisions.
SECTION 17. IC 27-1-37.5-17, AS AMENDED BY P.L.144-2025,
SECTION 27, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 17. (a) As used in this section, "necessary
information" includes the results of any face-to-face clinical evaluation,
second opinion, or other clinical information that is directly applicable
to the requested health care service that may be required.
(b) If a utilization review entity makes an adverse determination on
a prior authorization request by a covered individual's health care
provider, the utilization review entity must offer the covered
individual's health care provider the option to request a peer to peer
review by a clinical peer concerning the adverse determination.
(c) A covered individual's health care provider may request a peer
to peer review by a clinical peer either in writing or electronically.
(d) If a peer to peer review by a clinical peer is requested under this
section:
(1) the utilization review entity's clinical peer and the covered
individual's health care provider or the health care provider's
designee shall make every effort to provide the peer to peer
review not later than forty-eight (48) hours (excluding weekends
and state and federal legal holidays) after the utilization review
entity receives the request by the covered individual's health care
provider for a peer to peer review if the utilization review entity
SB 173—LS 6570/DI 104


has received the necessary information for the peer to peer
review; and
(2) the utilization review entity must have the peer to peer review
conducted between the clinical peer and the covered individual's
health care provider or the provider's designee; and
(3) the clinical peer must disclose the clinical peer's:
(A) full name;
(B) licensure; and
(C) speciality, if applicable;
to the covered individual's health care provider or the
provider's designee.
SECTION 18. IC 27-1-37.5-19.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 19.5. (a) A utilization review
entity may not use artificial intelligence as the primary means for
making adverse determinations.
(b) A utilization review entity must disclose in an easily
accessible and readable manner when artificial intelligence is used
during any part of the prior authorization review process.
SECTION 19. IC 27-1-37.5-20, AS ADDED BY P.L.144-2025,
SECTION 29, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 20. (a) A utilization review entity must ensure
that:
(1) all:
(A) adverse determinations based on medical necessity are
made;
(B) adverse determinations made through the use of
artificial intelligence are made; and
(B) (C) appeals are reviewed and decided;
by a clinical peer; and
(2) when making an adverse determination based on medical
necessity or reviewing and deciding an appeal under subdivision
(1), the clinical peer is under the clinical direction of a medical
director of the utilization review entity who is:
(A) responsible for the provision of health care services
provided to covered individuals; and
(B) a physician licensed in Indiana under IC 25-22.5.
(b) An appeal may not be reviewed or decided by a clinical peer
who:
(1) has a financial interest in the outcome of the appeal; or
(2) was involved in making the adverse determination that is the
subject of the appeal.
SB 173—LS 6570/DI 104


SECTION 20. IC 27-1-52.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 52.5. Downcoding of Medical Claims
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "CARC" refers to the claim
adjustment reason codes that provide the reason for a financial
adjustment specified to a particular claim or service, as referenced
in the transmitted Accredited Standards Committee (ASC) X12
835 standard transaction adopted by the Department of Health and
Human Services under 45 CFR 162.1602.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "clinical peer" has the meaning
set forth in IC 27-1-37.5-1.7.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "downcoding" means the
unilateral alteration by a health insurer of the level of evaluation
and management service code or other service code submitted on
a claim that results in a lower payment.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "health care provider" has the
meaning set forth in IC 27-1-37.5-3.9.
Sec. 5. (a) As used in this chapter, "health insurer" means an
entity:
(1) that is subject to this title and the administrative rules
adopted under this title; and
(2) that enters into a contract to:
(A) provide health care services;
(B) deliver health care services;
(C) arrange for health care services; or
(D) pay for or reimburse any of the costs of health care
services.
(b) The term includes the following:
(1) An insurer (as defined in IC 27-1-2-3(x)) that issues a
policy of accident and sickness insurance (as defined in
IC 27-8-5-1(a)).
(2) A health maintenance organization (as defined in
IC 27-13-1-19).
(3) An administrator (as defined in IC 27-1-25-1(a)) that is
licensed under IC 27-1-25.
(4) A state employee health plan offered under IC 5-10-8.
(5) A short term insurance plan (as defined in IC 27-8-5.9-3).
(6) Any other entity that provides a plan of health insurance,
health benefits, or health care services.
(c) The term does not include:
(1) an insurer that issues a policy of accident and sickness
SB 173—LS 6570/DI 104


insurance;
(2) a limited service health maintenance organization (as
defined in IC 27-13-34-4); or
(3) an administrator;
that only provides coverage for, or processes claims for, dental or
vision care services.
Sec. 6. As used in this chapter, "RARC" refers to remittance
advice remark codes that provide:
(1) supplemental information about a financial adjustment
indicated by a CARC; or
(2) information about remittance processing.
Sec. 7. (a) A health insurer may not use an automated:
(1) process;
(2) system; or
(3) tool, including artificial intelligence;
to downcode a claim.
(b) A downcoding decision must be made by a clinical peer who:
(1) is licensed in Indiana in the requisite health field
concerning the claim;
(2) has the same specialty as the treating health care provider;
and
(3) performs a documented review of the clinical information
supporting the billed service.
Sec. 8. A health insurer may not downcode a claim based solely
on the reported diagnosis code.
Sec. 9. If a claim is downcoded, the health insurer shall:
(1) notify the health care provider using the appropriate
CARC and RARC to clearly indicate that the claim has been
downcoded; and
(2) provide:
(A) the specific reason for the downcoding, including
reference to the clinical criteria used to justify the
downcoding;
(B) the original and revised service codes and payment
amounts;
(C) the:
(i) national provider identifier;
(ii) credentials;
(iii) board certifications; and
(iv) areas of specialty expertise and training;
of the clinical peer who is responsible for the downcoding
decision; and
SB 173—LS 6570/DI 104


(D) a notice of the right to appeal as described in section 10
of this chapter.
Sec. 10. (a) A health insurer shall provide health care providers
with a clear and accessible process for appealing downcoded
claims, including:
(1) a written or electronic notice detailing how to initiate an
appeal;
(2) contact information for the individual managing the
appeal;
(3) a timeline for submission of an appeal that is not less than
one hundred eighty (180) days; and
(4) a timeline for adjudication of an appeal that is not later
than forty-eight (48) hours after an appeal is submitted.
(b) A health insurer shall allow a health care provider to appeal
in batches of similar claims involving substantially similar
downcoding issues without restriction.
Sec. 11. A health insurer may not use downcoding practices in
a targeted or discriminatory manner against health care providers
who routinely treat patients with complex or chronic conditions.
Sec. 12. (a) The department has the authority to enforce this
chapter.
(b) The department may do any of the following:
(1) Impose monetary penalties of not more than fifty thousand
dollars ($50,000) per violation of this chapter.
(2) Order a health insurer to reprocess improperly
downcoded claims with interest.
(3) If a pattern or practice of discriminatory downcoding is
identified by the department, suspend a health insurer's
certificate of authority or license.
SECTION 21. IC 27-8-5-27.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 27.5. (a) This section applies to a
policy of accident and sickness insurance that provides coverage
for anesthesia services and is issued, amended, or renewed after
June 30, 2026.
(b) As used in this section, "anesthesia time" means the period
beginning when an anesthesia practitioner begins to prepare a
patient for anesthesia services in the operating room or an
equivalent area and ends when the anesthesia practitioner is no
longer furnishing anesthesia services to the patient. The term
includes blocks of time around an interruption in anesthesia time
provided that the anesthesia practitioner is furnishing continuous
SB 173—LS 6570/DI 104


anesthesia care within the time periods surrounding the
interruption.
(c) A policy of accident and sickness insurance may not impose
any of the following concerning the provision of anesthesia services
during a medical procedure:
(1) A time limit on the amount of covered anesthesia time for
any medical procedure.
(2) Restrictions or exclusions of coverage or payment of
anesthesia time.
SECTION 22. IC 27-13-7-15.2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 15.2. (a) This section applies to an
individual or group contract that provides coverage for anesthesia
services and is issued, amended, or renewed after June 30, 2026.
(b) As used in this section, "anesthesia time" means the period
beginning when an anesthesia practitioner begins to prepare a
patient for anesthesia services in the operating room or an
equivalent area and ends when the anesthesia practitioner is no
longer furnishing anesthesia services to the patient. The term
includes blocks of time around an interruption in anesthesia time
provided that the anesthesia practitioner is furnishing continuous
anesthesia care within the time periods surrounding the
interruption.
(c) An individual or group contract may not impose any of the
following concerning the provision of anesthesia services during a
medical procedure:
(1) A time limit on the amount of covered anesthesia time for
any medical procedure.
(2) Restrictions or exclusions of coverage or payment of
anesthesia time.
SECTION 23. IC 34-30-2.1-256.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 256.5. IC 16-42-26.7-9
(Concerning practitioners, eligible facilities, research institutions,
and other persons participating in providing neuroplastogen
treatment).
SB 173—LS 6570/DI 104


COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. President: The Senate Committee on Health and Provider
Services, to which was referred Senate Bill No. 173, has had the same
under consideration and begs leave to report the same back to the
Senate with the recommendation that said bill be AMENDED as
follows:
Page 16, delete lines 7 through 42.
Delete pages 17 through 20.
Page 21, delete lines 1 through 17, begin a new paragraph and
insert:
"SECTION 21. IC 27-1-24.2-16, AS ADDED BY P.L.189-2025,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 16. (a) Except as provided in section 15 of this
chapter, with respect to the provision of pharmacy or pharmacist
services under a health plan, an insurer, a pharmacy benefit manager,
or any other administrator of pharmacy benefits may not:
(1) prohibit a pharmacy or pharmacist from, or impose a penalty
on a pharmacy or pharmacist for:
(A) selling a lower cost alternative to an insured, if a lower
cost alternative is available; or
(B) providing information to an insured under subsection (c);
(2) discriminate against any pharmacy or pharmacist that is:
(A) located within the geographic coverage area of the health
plan; and
(B) willing to agree to, or accept, terms and conditions
established for participation in the insurer's, pharmacy benefit
manager's, other administrator's, or health plan's network;
(3) impose limits, including quantity limits or refill frequency
limits, on an insured's access to medication from a pharmacy that
are more restrictive than those existing for a pharmacy affiliate;
(4) except as provided in subsection (b), require an insured to
receive pharmacy or pharmacist services from a pharmacy
affiliate, including:
(A) requiring an insured to obtain a specialty drug from a
pharmacy affiliate; and
(B) charging less cost sharing to insureds that use pharmacy
affiliates than what is charged to insureds that use
nonaffiliated pharmacies;
(5) require a pharmacy or pharmacist to enter into an additional
contract with an affiliate of the insurer, pharmacy benefit
manager, or other administrator of pharmacy benefits as a
SB 173—LS 6570/DI 104


condition of entering into a contract with this insurer, pharmacy
benefit manager, or administrator; or
(6) require a pharmacy or pharmacist to, as a condition of a
contract, agree to payment rates for any affiliate of the insurer,
pharmacy benefit manager, or other administrator of pharmacy
benefits that is not a party to the contract; or
(7) designate a prescription drug as a specialty drug unless the
drug is a limited distribution that:
(A) requires special handling; and
(B) is not commonly carried at retail pharmacies or
oncology clinics or practices.
(b) Subsection (a)(4):
(1) does not apply to a mail order pharmacy; and
(2) may not be construed to prohibit:
(A) communications to insureds regarding networks and prices
if the communication is accurate and includes information
about all eligible nonaffiliated pharmacies; or
(B) an insurer, a pharmacy benefit manager, or any other
administrator of pharmacy benefits from providing financial
incentives for utilizing the network, if the insurer, pharmacy
benefit manager, or other administrator complies with this
section and section 14 of this chapter.
(c) A pharmacist shall have the right to provide an insured with
information regarding lower cost alternatives to assist the insured in
making informed decisions.".
Page 22, line 25, delete ";" and insert "are made;".
Page 23, line 8, after "2." insert "As used in this chapter, "clinical
peer" has the meaning set forth in IC 27-1-37.5-1.7.
Sec. 3.".
Page 23, line 12, delete "3." and insert "4. As used in this chapter,
"health care provider" has the meaning set forth in
IC 27-1-37.5-3.9.
Sec. 5.".
Page 23, line 42, delete "4." and insert "6.".
Page 24, line 5, delete "5." and insert "7.".
Page 24, line 10, delete "physician" and insert "clinical peer".
Page 24, line 11, delete "under IC 25-22.5;" and insert "in the
requisite health field concerning the claim;".
Page 24, line 12, delete "physician;" and insert "health care
provider;".
Page 24, line 15, delete "6." and insert "8.".
Page 24, line 17, delete "7." and insert "9.".
SB 173—LS 6570/DI 104


Page 24, line 18, delete "physician" and insert "health care
provider".
Page 24, line 32, delete "physician" and insert "clinical peer".
Page 24, line 34, delete "8" and insert "10".
Page 24, line 36, delete "8." and insert "10.".
Page 24, line 36, delete "physicians" and insert "health care
providers".
Page 25, line 4, delete "physician" and insert "health care
provider".
Page 25, line 7, delete "9." and insert "11.".
Page 25, line 8, delete "physicians" and insert "health care
providers".
Page 25, line 10, delete "10." and insert "12.".
Page 25, delete lines 20 through 42.
Delete pages 26 through 31.
Page 32, delete lines 1 through 28.
Renumber all SECTIONS consecutively.
and when so amended that said bill do pass and be reassigned to the
Senate Committee on Appropriations.
(Reference is to SB 173 as introduced.)
CHARBONNEAU, Chairperson
Committee Vote: Yeas 10, Nays 0.
SB 173—LS 6570/DI 104